Arizona Science Standards
                  2018
   Arizona Department of Education
       High Academic Standards for Students


                                                            Arizona Science Standards
                                                               Introduction
Students are naturally curious about the world and their place in it. Sustaining this curiosity and giving it a scientific foundation must be a
high priority in Arizona schools. Scientific thinking enables Arizona students to strengthen skills that people use every day: solving
problems creatively, thinking critically, working cooperatively in teams, using technology effectively, and valuing lifelong learning. A
fundamental goal of science education is to help students determine how the world works and make sense of phenomena in the natural
world. Phenomena are observable events that can be explained or explored. Science aims to explain the causes of these events, or
phenomena, using scientific ideas, concepts, and practices (3-dimensions). Sense-making in science is a conceptual process in which a
learner actively engages with phenomena in the natural world to construct logical and coherent explanations that incorporate their
current understanding of science or a model that represents it and are consistent with the available evidence. To develop a scientific
understanding of the natural world, students must be able to ask questions, gather information, reason about that information and
connect it to scientific principles, theories, or models, and then effectively communicate their understanding and reasoning.
Purpose of the Arizona Science Standards
The Arizona Science Standards present a vision of what it means to be scientifically literate, and college and career ready. These standards
outline what all students need to know, understand, and be able to do by the end of high school and reflect the following shifts for science
education:
    ● Organize standards around thirteen core ideas and develop learning progressions to coherently and logically build scientific
        literacy from kindergarten through high school.
    ● Connect core ideas, crosscutting concepts, and science and engineering practices, to make sense of the natural world and
        understand how science and engineering are practiced and experienced.
    ● Focus on fewer, broader standards that allow for greater depth, more connections, deeper understanding, and more applications
        of content.
Arizona Department of Education                                  Page| 2               Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                             Arizona Science Standards
The standards are neither curriculum nor instructional practices.
While the Arizona Science Standards serve as the basis for a district’s or school’s science curriculum, they are not the curriculum.
Therefore, identifying the sequence of instruction at each grade – what will be taught and for how long – requires concerted effort and
attention at the local level. Curricular tools, including textbooks, are selected by the district/school and adopted through the local
governing board. The Arizona Department of Education defines standards, curriculum, and instruction as:
    ● Standards are what a student needs to know,
        understand, and be able to do by the end of each
        grade. They build across grade levels in a
        progression of increasing understanding and
        through a range of cognitive demand levels.
        Standards are adopted at the state level by the
        Arizona State Board of Education.
    ● Curriculum refers to resources used for teaching
        and learning the standards. Curricula are adopted
        at the local level.
    ● Instruction refers to the methods or
        methodologies used by teachers to teach their
        students. Instructional techniques are employed by
        individual teachers in response to the needs of the
        students in their classes to help them progress
        through the curriculum to master the standards.
        Decisions about instructional practice and
        techniques are made at a local level.
Three Dimensions of Science
Sense-making in science occurs with the integration of
three essential dimensions:
    ● science and engineering practices (shown as the
        outer ring in Figure 1)
    ● crosscutting concepts (shown as the middle
        section of Figure 1)
    ● core ideas (shown as the center circle in Figure 1)
Arizona Department of Education                                   Page| 3                 Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                           Arizona Science Standards
Science and Engineering Practices
For decades teachers have utilized the scientific method as a methodology to engage in scientific inquiry. Traditional implementation
often has resulted in viewing science as a linear process. The new vision calls for students to engage in multifaceted science and
engineering practices in more complex, relevant, and authentic ways. The science and engineering practices4 describe a robust process
for how scientists investigate and build models and theories of the natural world or how engineers design and build systems. Rather than
a linear process from hypothesis to conclusion, these practices reflect science and engineering as they are practiced and experienced. As
students conduct investigations, they engage in multiple practices as they gather information to solve problems, answer their questions,
reason about how the data provide evidence to support their
understanding, and then communicate their understanding of
phenomena. Student investigations may be observational,
experimental, use models or simulations, or use data from other
sources. These eight practices identified in A Framework for K-12
Science Education4 are critical components of scientific literacy,
not instructional strategies:
     • ask questions and define problems
     ● develop and use models
     ● plan and carry out investigations
     ● analyze and interpret data
     ● use mathematics and computational thinking
     ● construct explanations and design solutions
     ● engage in argument from evidence
     ● obtain, evaluate, and communicate information
While the scientific method is still being widely used, and a part of
academics, the science and engineering practices are expected to
be integrated with the core ideas and crosscutting concepts across
all grade levels and disciplines. See Appendix 2 for more details on
each of the science and engineering practices.
Arizona Department of Education                                 Page| 4                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                           Arizona Science Standards
Crosscutting Concepts
Crosscutting concepts4 cross boundaries between science disciplines and provide an organizational framework to connect knowledge
from various disciplines into a coherent and scientifically based view of the world. They build bridges between science and other
disciplines and connect core ideas and practices throughout the fields of science and engineering. Their purpose is to provide a lens to
help students deepen their understanding of the core ideas as they make sense of phenomena in the natural and designed worlds. The
crosscutting concepts identified in A Framework for K-12 Science Education are:
    ● patterns
    ● cause and effect
    ● structure and function
    ● systems and system models
    ● stability and change
    ● scale, proportion, and quantity
    ● energy and matter
The Arizona Science Standards are designed for students to develop their
understanding of core ideas through the lens of one or multiple crosscutting
concepts. Crosscutting concepts can be combined as students find and use
patterns as evidence, determine cause and effect relationships, or define
systems to investigate. Students must be provided with structures and
opportunities to make explicit connections between their learning and the
crosscutting concepts. See Appendix 1 for more details on each of the
crosscutting concepts.
The use of crosscutting concepts can be demonstrated within cause and
effect relationships. For example, researchers investigate cause and effect
mechanisms in the motion of a single object, specific chemical reactions,
population changes in an ecosystem, and the development of holes in the
polar ozone layers. Patterns are present in all science disciplines, and much
of science is about explaining observed patterns. Using data, graphs, charts,
maps, and statistics in combination with the science and engineering
practices, students can use their knowledge of cause and effect relationships
to formulate investigations, answer questions, and make informed
predictions about observed phenomena.
Arizona Department of Education                                  Page| 5              Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                     Arizona Science Standards
Core Ideas
The Arizona Science Standards focus on thirteen core ideas in science and engineering, adapted from
Working with Big Ideas of Science Education.2 The ten core ideas for Knowing Science center on
understanding the causes of phenomena in physical, earth and space, and life science. The three core
ideas for Using Science connect scientific principles, theories, and models; engineering and
technological applications; and societal implications to the content knowledge to support that
understanding. The complexity of each core idea develops as students’ progress through each grade
band. Each standard is written at the intersection of two core ideas to help students understand both
the process of knowing science and using science. These core ideas occur across grade levels and
provide the background knowledge for students to develop sense-making around phenomena in the
natural world. See Appendix 3 for more details. The core ideas are listed below.
 Core Ideas for Knowing Science                                                                           Core Ideas for Using Science
 Physical Science                                                                                          U1: Scientists explain phenomena using
   P1: All matter in the Universe is made of very small particles.                                             evidence obtained from observations and
   P2: Objects can affect other objects at a distance.                                                         or scientific investigations. Evidence may
   P3: Changing the movement of an object requires a net force to be acting on it.                             lead to developing models and or
   P4: The total amount of energy in a closed system is always the same but can be transferred                 theories to make sense of phenomena.
        from one energy store to another during an event.                                                      As new evidence is discovered, models
 Earth and Space Science
                                                                                                               and theories can be revised.
   E1: The composition of the Earth and its atmosphere and the natural and human processes
                                                                                                           U2: The knowledge produced by science is
        occurring within them shape the Earth’s surface and its climate.
                                                                                                               used in engineering and technologies to
   E2: The Earth and our solar system are a very small part of one of many galaxies within the
        Universe.                                                                                              solve problems and/or create products.
 Life Science                                                                                              U3: Applications of science often have both
   L1: Organisms are organized on a cellular basis and have a finite life span.                                positive and negative ethical, social,
   L2: Organisms require a supply of energy and materials for which they often depend on, or                   economic, and/or political implications.
        compete with, other organisms.
   L3: Genetic information is passed down from one generation of organisms to another.
   L4: The unity and diversity of organisms, living and extinct, is the result of evolution.
 *Adapted from Working with Big Ideas in Science Education2
Arizona Department of Education                                            Page| 6             Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                              Arizona Science Standards
Time Allotment
The Arizona Science Standards suggest students have regular standards-based science instruction every year. The amount of time individual
students need to learn these standards will vary. The chart below specifies the instructional time necessary for students to master these
standards.
The Arizona Science Standards have been designed so that these time suggestions provide adequate time to actively engage in all 3 dimensions
of science instruction to master the standards for each grade level. Depending on local factors, schools may allocate more or less time when
determining curriculum programming within a specific context. Instruction on the Arizona Science Standards may be a dedicated time in the school
schedule or may be integrated with the instruction of other subjects. See Appendix 5 and the Standards document for connections with other
content areas.
These time recommendations do not explicitly address the needs of students who are far below or far above the grade level.
No set of grade-specific standards can fully reflect the variety of abilities, needs, learning rates, and achievement levels of students in any given
classroom. The Arizona Science Standards do not define the intervention methods to support students who are far below or far above grade level
or do not speak English as their first language. See Appendix 4 for strategies to support equity and diversity in science.
                           Grade                   Suggested Minutes per Week                 Suggested Average Minutes per Day
                             K                              90 minutes/week                                 18 minutes/day
                             1                             150 minutes/week                                 30 minutes/day
                             2                             150 minutes/week                                 30 minutes/day
                             3                             200 minutes/week                                 40 minutes/day
                             4                             225 minutes/week                                 45 minutes/day
                             5                             225 minutes/week                                 45 minutes/day
                             6                             250 minutes/week                                 50 minutes/day
                             7                             250 minutes/week                                 50 minutes/day
                             8                             250 minutes/week                                 50 minutes/day
                       HS (3 credits)                      275 minutes/week                                 55 minutes/day
Arizona Department of Education                                     Page| 7                   Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                               Arizona Science Standards
Safety Expectations
While there are no specific standards that address laboratory or field safety, it is a required part of science education to instruct and guide
students in using appropriate safety precautions for all investigations. Reducing risk and preventing accidents in science classrooms
begins with planning that meets all local, state, and federal requirements, including Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and
Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) requirements for safe handling and disposal of laboratory materials. The following
four steps are recommended for carrying out a hazard and risk assessment for any investigation5:
    1) Identify hazards. Hazards may be physical, chemical, health, or environmental.
    2) Evaluate the type of risk associated with each hazard.
    3) Instruct students on all procedures and necessary safety precautions in such a way as to eliminate or reduce the risk associated
        with each hazard.
    4) Prepare for any emergency that might arise despite all the required safety precautions.
Chemical Storage Expectations
What You Can Do
    ● Put in place an experienced leadership team to oversee chemical management, storage, and handling activities.
    ● Implement pollution prevention and green chemistry (safer alternatives) principles to minimize the use of hazardous chemicals at schools.
    ● Establish an environmentally preferable purchasing policy and conduct periodic chemical inventories to identify hazards.
    ● Train school personnel on hazardous chemicals management and safety.
    ● Create an emergency response and spill clean-up plan. Communicate with school personnel and students about the plan and the chemicals and
        products in the school.
    ● EPA's Chemicals under the Toxic Substance Control Act (TSCA) provides information about this law which protects us from the potential risks
        of pesticides and toxic chemicals.
    ● The Center for Disease Control's Facts about Mercury in Schools provides information for school administrators, faculty, staff, local health
        jurisdictions, and parent groups on how to reduce the hazards of mercury on children's health, avoid chemical liabilities, develop planning
        tools, and establish collection programs for mercury.
    ● Chemical Management in Schools is addressed by the Colorado Department of Public Health and Environment, including guidance on self-
        certification for school laboratories, inventory procedures, lists of common chemical hazards and prohibited or restricted chemicals, and more.
    ● The School Chemistry Laboratory Safety Guide presents information about ordering, using, storing, and maintaining chemicals in the high
        school laboratory. The guide also provides information about chemical waste, safety, and emergency equipment, assessing chemical hazards,
        common safety symbols, signs, and fundamental resources relating to chemical safety, such as Material Safety Data Sheets and Chemical
        Hygiene Plans, to help create a safe environment for learning. Also, checklists are provided for both teachers and students that highlight
        important information for working in the laboratory and identify hazards and safe work procedures.
Arizona Department of Education                                      Page| 8                   Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                           Arizona Science Standards
Coding of the K-8 Science Standards
Each K-8 standard represents the intersection of core ideas for knowing science and using science. This intersection stresses that content
in physical science, earth and space science, and life science is not learned independently from ideas about the nature of science,
applications of science, or the social implications of using science. The coding of the standard captures this intersection. Students engage
in multiple practices as they gather information to solve problems, answer their questions, reason about how the data provide evidence to
support their understanding, and then communicate their understanding of phenomena, applications, or social implications. They use the
crosscutting concepts to support their understanding of patterns, cause and effect relationships, and systems thinking as they make sense
of phenomena. The standard number at the end of the code is designed for recording purposes and does not imply instructional sequence
or importance. The images below are examples and descriptions of coding of the K-8 Standards.
Arizona Department of Education                                  Page| 9                 Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                            Arizona Science Standards
Coding of the High School Science Standards
In Arizona, students are required to take 3 credits of high school science aligned to standards in physical, earth and space, and life sciences
to meet graduation requirements, but there is no mandatory course sequence across the state. Because of this, the high school standards
are written at two levels: essential and plus.
    ●    All high school essential standards (HS) should be learned by every high school student regardless of the 3-credit course sequence
         they take. The full set of essential high school (HS) standards is designed to be taught over a 3-year period.
    ●    The high school plus (HS+) standards are designed to enhance the rigor of general science courses by extending the essential
         standards within general chemistry (HS+C), physics (HS+Phy), earth and space sciences (HS+E), or biology (HS+B) courses. These
         HS+ standards are intended to provide the additional rigor of these courses to prepare students for college courses for science
         majors.
Like K-8, each high school standard represents the
intersection of core ideas for knowing science and
using science. This intersection stresses that content
in physical science, earth and space science, and life
science is not learned independently from ideas about
the nature of science, applications of science, or the
social implications of using science. The coding of the
standard captures this intersection. Students engage
in multiple practices as they gather information to
solve problems, answer their questions, reason about
how the data provide evidence to support their
understanding, and then communicate their
understanding of phenomena, applications, or social
implications. They use the crosscutting concepts to
support their understanding of patterns, cause and
effect relationships, and systems thinking as they
make sense of phenomena. The standard number at
the end of the code is designed for recording
purposes and does not imply instructional sequence
or importance. At right are examples and
descriptions of coding of the High School Science
Standards.
Arizona Department of Education                                   Page| 10                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                 Arizona Science Standards
                                                Navigating the Standards Document
                     Standards                                                       Support Material
        Guide to Explain Standards
              The standards are what is expected for students to       The Crosscutting Concepts and Background Information for
              master at the end of the grade level and are intended to Educators is a guidance resource embedded into the standards
                                                                                                                                         Support Material
              be the content utilized for the state assessment. They   document. This is the first step to deepen content knowledge
  Standards
              contain the disciplinary core ideas and the science and  and to make apparent the research behind the standard. The
              engineering practices (SEPs) that are in bold in the     learning progression is supporting material and not the basis
              standard. It may take several science and engineering    for assessment.
              practices to reach the desired level of depth of content.The crosscutting concepts listed connect to other standards
              These are expected to be learned over the course of the  for themes and integrated science instruction, one of the key
              year throughout multiple standards.                      components of three-dimensional science instruction. Bold
                                                                       crosscutting concepts indicate the concepts that are across the
                                                                       grade level. Example: cause and effect and stability and change
                                                  Rationale of Changes are
                                                                       to the 2018 Standards
                                                                           dominant             Document
                                                                                     crosscutting  concepts for first grade.
Arizona Department of Education                                           Page| 11             Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                          Arizona Science Standards
                                                    Rationale of Changes to the 2018 Standards Document
Changes have been made to the standards document while NO changes have been made to the standards themselves. To better support the implementation of standards, slight
modifications were made only to the right side of this document.
 Date         Changes                                                                  Rationale
   4/5/19     Grammar and formatting.                                                  Consistency throughout document.
  10/19/19
 7/26/19      Introduction section 4th sentence                                        Clarity on what phenomena is.
              Phenomena are observable events that can be explained or
              explored. Science seeks to explain the causes of phenomena using
              scientific practices, ideas, and concepts.
 7/26/19      “Learning Progressions, Key Terms, and Crosscutting Concepts” was        To ensure the information from A Framework for K-12 Science Education and Working with
              retitled to “Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for          Big Ideas of Science Education was being used as background education for the educator.
              Educators” on the right side of the standards document.                  This is not a sequence of learning, but rather provides background content knowledge for
                                                                                       the educator on the resource that was utilized when writing the standards.
 7/26/19      The Crosscutting Concepts were moved from the bottom of the              The Crosscutting Concepts were moved to show that they are not an afterthought.
              page to the top of the page.
 8/8/19       All 7 Crosscutting Concepts are listed, instead of just the “focus” CCC  To ensure educators understand that there are 7 CCCs in total, and further explain that the
              for each grade level.                                                    bolded CCCs are the “focus” crosscutting concepts for that particular grade level.
 8/8/19       Replaced and updated the graphic used on page 11 to match the            Updated image to match the updated right side of the standards document.
              updates to the right side of the document.
 8/8/19       Under the sections titled “Background Information” the font was          To better format the document and try to avoid page breaks within a standard.
              changed from 10 point to 9 point.
 9/25/19      Physical 6.1-3 Standard Teacher Background change                        Added: Info from pg. 108 Framework
                                                                                       Reason: No information in original regarding temperature and pressure to give deeper
                                                                                       background on standard regarding substances.
 9/25/19      Life 7.10-12 Standard Teacher Background change                          Added/Moved: Info from 6th grade life standards from the background information (6.11-
                                                                                       14), to Life 7th grade standards 10-12.
                                                                                       Reason: The information connects better to 7th grade life than it did to 6th grade life.
                                                                                       Identified by ASTA 5 Tools team while making unpacking cards.
 9/25/19      7.E1U1.5 Standard Teacher Background change                              Added/Moved: Info from 7.E1U1.7 earth standard from the background to 7.E1U1.5
                                                                                       standard
                                                                                       Reason: This section was moved from standard 7 to standard 5 because 5 discusses the
                                                                                       “science knowledge” this background addresses. Standard 7 was about the technology and
                                                                                       engineering. Info from the Framework was added to 7 to meet the technology needs of
                                                                                       standard 7.
 9/25/19      7.E1U2.7 Standard Teacher Background change                              Added: Info from pg. 194 from the Framework to Teacher Background
                                                                                       Reason: To address the part of 7th grade standard 7/this is a U2 standard and the part of
                                                                                       the standard that addresses technology used to predict weather.
Arizona Department of Education                                                  Page| 12                       Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                   Arizona Science Standards
 9/25/19   7.L1U1.9                                                             Added: Info from pg. 144 from the Framework to Teacher Background
                                                                                Reason: Need to add information to Teacher Background from A Framework to address to
                                                                                address the function of the cell membrane.
 9/25/19   7th grade L1 standards                                               Merged the box for all L1 life standards. The Teacher Background fits all these L1
                                                                                standards, it was repetitive before. The single L2 standard was left in its own box.
                                                                                Information added to Teacher Background, see note below:
 9/25/19   7.L2U1.12                                                            Added: Info from pg. 144 from the Framework to Teacher Background
                                                                                Reason: Need to add information to Teacher Background from A Framework to address to
                                                                                address the function of the cell membrane. (List some actual structures in the cell)
 9/25/19   7.L2U1.8-9                                                           Moved: “Life is the quality that distinguishes living things - composed of living cells, from
                                                                                nonliving objects or those that have died. While a simple definition of life can be difficult to
                                                                                capture, all living things - that is to say all organisms - can be characterized by common
                                                                                aspects of their structure and functioning.” From lower in the Teacher Background box, to
                                                                                higher up in the Teacher Background.
                                                                                Reason: To allow for better flow of information. (Like with Like)
 9/25/19   8.3- physical                                                        Added: Teacher Background from pg. 23 of Big Ideas
                                                                                Reason: Added to further explain the transfer of energy
 9/25/19   7.P3U1.4                                                             Added: Teacher Background from pg. 115-116 A Framework
                                                                                Reason: Clarify what shape and orientation means for forces
 10/16/19  8.P1U1.1-2                                                           Added: Section from page 111 from the Framework
                                                                                Reason: Added from Framework to include all research when writing standards.
 10/16/19  6.P2U1.4                                                             Added: Section from page 118 from the Framework
                                                                                Reason: Added from Framework to include all research when writing standards.
 10/16/19  6E1U1.6                                                              Added: Section from page 188 from the Framework
                                                                                Reason: Added from Framework to include all research when writing standards.
 10/19/19  Page 4- Science and Engineering Practices, the second sentence was   Changed second sentence to “Traditional implementation often has resulted in viewing
           changed                                                              science as a linear process” for clarity.
 10/19/19  Page 5- Crosscutting Concepts, the second sentence was changed.      Changed second sentence to “They build bridges between science and other disciplines
                                                                                and connect core ideas and practices throughout the fields of science and engineering”
                                                                                for clarity.
Arizona Department of Education                                           Page| 13                       Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                          Arizona Science Standards
                                                Grades 3-5 Science Standards
The Grades 3-5 Science Standards are designed to provide opportunities for students to develop an understanding of all thirteen core
ideas (see Appendix 3) across the 3-5 grade band. To sufficiently demonstrate knowledge, understanding, and performance of each
standard, not every core idea is included in every grade.
Within each grade level, students engage in multiple science and engineering practices as they gather information to answer their
questions or solve design problems by reasoning how the data provide evidence to support their understanding, and then communicate
their understanding of phenomena in physical, earth and space, and life science (the knowing of science). Students apply their knowledge
of the core ideas to understand phenomena, see the impact, or construct technological solutions (using science). The crosscutting
concepts support their understanding of patterns, cause and effect relationships, and systems thinking as students make sense of
phenomena in the natural and designed worlds. The practices, core ideas, and crosscutting concepts help students develop an
understanding of skills and knowledge to transfer them from one grade to
the next and between content areas.
    ● In third grade, students develop an understanding of systems and
        system models along with structure and function involving energy
        and matter.
     ● In fourth grade, students apply systems and system models as they
         investigate how energy and the availability of resources affects
         Earth systems (geosphere and biosphere). They also develop an
         understanding of stability and change with regards to how
         populations of organisms and Earth have changed over time.
     ● In fifth grade, students apply their understanding of scale at micro
         levels as they investigate changes in matter and at macro levels as
         they investigate patterns of genetic information and movement
         between Earth and Moon.
The organization of the standards within this document does not indicate
instructional sequence or importance. Decisions about curriculum and
instruction are made locally by individual school districts and classroom
teachers; these standards can be sequenced, combined, or integrated with
other content areas to best meet the local curriculum or student needs (See
Appendices 4 and 5). It is suggested to use the metric system for
measurement, as most scientific tools utilize the metric system.
Arizona Department of Education                                Page| 14               Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                     Arizona Science Standards
            Third Grade: Focus on Systems and System Models; Structure and Function
By the end of third grade, students will gain an understanding of how the Sun provides energy for life on Earth. Students apply their
understanding of light and sound waves, how they travel, are detected, and transfer energy. Students learn that organisms have different
structures and functions which increase their chances of survival. Student investigations focus on collecting and making sense of
observational data and simple measurements using the science and engineering practices: ask questions and define problems, develop and
use models, plan and carry out investigations, analyze and interpret data, use mathematics and computational thinking, construct
explanations and design solutions, engage in argument from evidence, and obtain, evaluate, and communicate information. While individual
lessons may include connections to any of the crosscutting concepts, the standards in third grade focus on helping students understand
phenomena through systems and system models and structure and function.
 Core Ideas for Knowing Science*                                                                         Core Ideas for Using Science*
 Physical Science                                                                                         U1: Scientists explain phenomena using
   P1: All matter in the Universe is made of very small particles.                                            evidence obtained from observations and
   P2: Objects can affect other objects at a distance.                                                        or scientific investigations. Evidence may
   P3: Changing the movement of an object requires a net force to be acting on it.                            lead to developing models and or
   P4: The total amount of energy in a closed system is always the same but can be transferred                theories to make sense of phenomena.
        from one energy store to another during an event.                                                     As new evidence is discovered, models
 Earth and Space Science
                                                                                                              and theories can be revised.
   E1: The composition of the Earth and its atmosphere and the natural and human processes
                                                                                                          U2: The knowledge produced by science is
        occurring within them shape the Earth’s surface and its climate.
                                                                                                              used in engineering and technologies to
   E2: The Earth and our solar system are a very small part of one of many galaxies within the
        Universe.                                                                                             solve problems and/or create products.
 Life Science                                                                                             U3: Applications of science often have both
   L1: Organisms are organized on a cellular basis and have a finite life span.                               positive and negative ethical, social,
   L2: Organisms require a supply of energy and materials for which they often depend on, or                  economic, and/or political implications.
        compete with, other organisms.
   L3: Genetic information is passed down from one generation of organisms to another.
   L4: The unity and diversity of organisms, living and extinct, is the result of evolution.
   *Adapted from Working with Big Ideas in Science Education2
Arizona Department of Education                                            Page| 15            Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                     Arizona Science Standards
Physical Sciences: Students develop an understanding of the sources, properties, and characteristics of energy along with the
relationship between energy transfer and the human body.
 Physical Science Standards                                Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 3.P2U1.1                                                  Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                           Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Ask questions and investigate the relationship between    System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 light, objects, and the human eye.                        Change4
                                                           Background Information:
 3.P2U1.2                                                  Light is seen because it affects the objects it reaches, including our eyes. Sources give out
                                                           light, which travels from them in various directions and is detected when it reaches and
                                                           enters our eyes. Objects that are seen either give out or reflect light that human eyes can
 Plan and carry out an investigation to explore how        detect. Sound comes from things that vibrate and can be detected at a distance from the
 sound waves affect objects at varying distances.          source because the air or other material around is made to vibrate. Sounds are heard
                                                           when the vibrations in the air enter our ears. 2 (p 21). An object can be seen when light
                                                           reflected from its surface enters the eyes; the color people see depends on the color of the
                                                           available light sources as well as the properties of the surface. Because lenses bend light
                                                           beams, they can be used, singly or in combination, to provide magnified images of objects
                                                           too small or too far away to be seen with the naked eye.4 (p. 135) Waves of the same type can
                                                           differ in amplitude (height of the wave) and wavelength (spacing between wave peaks).
                                                           Waves can add or cancel one another as they cross, depending on their relative phase (i.e.,
                                                           relative position of peaks and troughs of the waves), but they emerge unaffected by each
                                                           other. (Boundary: The discussion at this grade level is qualitative only; it can be based on
                                                           the fact that two different sounds can pass a location in different directions without
                                                           getting mixed up.) 4 (p. 132)
Arizona Department of Education                           Page| 16                       Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                      Arizona Science Standards
 3.P4U1.3                                                   Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Develop and use models to describe how light and sound     Crosscutting Concepts:
 waves transfer energy.                                     Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
                                                            System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                            Change4
                                                            Background Information:
                                                            The faster a given object is moving, the more energy it possesses. Energy can be moved
                                                            from place to place by moving objects or through sound or light. (Boundary: At this
                                                            grade level, no attempt is made to give a precise or complete definition of energy.) 4 (p. 122)
                                                            Energy is present whenever there are moving objects, sound, light, or heat. When
                                                            objects collide, energy can be transferred from one object to another, thereby changing
                                                            their motion. In such collisions, some energy is typically also transferred to the
                                                            surrounding air; as a result, the air gets heated and sound is produced. Light also
                                                            transfers energy from place to place. For example, energy radiated from the sun is
                                                            transferred to Earth by light. When this light is absorbed, it warms Earth’s land, air, and
                                                            water and facilitates plant growth.4(p.125)
Earth and Space Sciences: Students develop an understanding of how the Sun provides light and energy for Earth systems.
 Earth and Space Standards                                  Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 3.E1U1.4                                                   Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                            Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Construct an explanation describing how the Sun is the     System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 primary source of energy impacting Earth systems.          Change4
                                                            Background Information:
                                                            All Earth processes are the result of energy flowing and matter cycling within and among
                                                            Earth’s systems. This energy originates from the sun and from Earth’s interior. 4 (179-180)
                                                            Earth’s major systems are the geosphere (solid and molten rock, soil, and sediments), the
                                                            hydrosphere (water and ice), the atmosphere (air), and the biosphere (living things,
                                                            including humans). These systems interact in multiple ways to affect Earth’s surface
                                                            materials and processes.4 (181)
Arizona Department of Education                            Page| 17                       Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                         Arizona Science Standards
Life Sciences: Students develop an understanding of the flow of energy in a system beginning with the Sun to and among
organisms They also understand that plants and animals (including humans) have specialized internal and external structures
and can respond to stimuli to increase survival.
 Life Science Standards                                        Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 3.L1U1.5                                                      Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                               Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Develop and use models to explain that plants and             System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 animals (including humans) have internal and external         Change4
 structures that serve various functions that aid in growth,
                                                               Background Information:
 survival, behavior, and reproduction.                         Animals have both internal and external structures
                                                               that serve various functions in growth, survival, behavior, and reproduction.
 3.L2U1.6                                                      (Boundary: Stress at this grade level focus is on understanding the macroscale systems
                                                               and their function, not microscopic processes.) 4 (p. 144)
 Plan and carry out investigations to demonstrate ways
 plants and animals react to stimuli.
 3.L2U1.7                                                      Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Develop and use system models to describe the flow of         Crosscutting Concepts:
 energy from the Sun to and among living organisms.            Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
                                                               System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                               Change4
                                                               Background Information:
                                                               The food of almost any kind of animal can be traced back to plants. Organisms are
                                                               related in food webs in which some animals eat plants. Either way, they are
                                                               “consumers.” Some organisms, such as fungi and bacteria, break down dead organisms
                                                               (both plants or plants parts and animals) and therefore operate as “decomposers.”
                                                               Decomposition eventually restores (recycles) some materials back to the soil for plants
                                                               to use. Organisms can survive only in environments in which their particular needs are
                                                               met. A healthy ecosystem is one in which multiple species of different types are each
                                                               able to meet their needs in a relatively stable web of life. Newly introduced species can
                                                               damage the balance of an ecosystem.4 (p. 151) Matter cycles between the air and soil and
                                                               among plants, animals, and microbes as these organisms live and die. Organisms obtain
                                                               gases, water, and minerals from the environment and release waste matter (gas, liquid,
                                                               or solid) back into the environment. 4 (p. 153)
Arizona Department of Education                               Page| 18                      Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                  Arizona Science Standards
 3.L2U1.8                                               Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Construct an argument from evidence that organisms     Crosscutting Concepts:
 are interdependent.                                    Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
                                                        System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                        Change4
                                                        Background Information:
                                                        Animals and plants alike generally need to take in air and water, animals must take in
                                                        food, and plants need light and minerals; anaerobic life, such as bacteria in the gut,
                                                        functions without air. Food provides animals with the materials they need for body
                                                        repair and growth and is digested to release the energy they need to maintain body
                                                        warmth and for motion. Plants acquire their material for growth chiefly from air and
                                                        water and process matter they have formed to maintain their internal conditions (e.g.,
                                                        at night). 4 (p. 148) Animals need food that they can break down, which comes either directly
                                                        by eating plants (herbivores) or by eating animals (carnivores) which have eaten plants
                                                        or other animals. Animals are ultimately dependent on plants for their survival. The
                                                        relationships among organisms can be represented as food chains and food webs. Some
                                                        animals are dependent on plants in other ways as well as for food, for example for shelter
                                                        and, in the case of human beings, for clothing and fuel. Plants also depend on animals in
                                                        various ways. For example, many flowering plants depend on insects for pollination and
                                                        on other animals for dispersing their seeds.2 (p. 27)
Arizona Department of Education                        Page| 19                          Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                     Arizona Science Standards
     Fourth Grade: Systems and System Models; Energy and Matter; Stability and Change
By the end of fourth grade, students expand on the idea that energy from the Sun interacts with Earth systems and explore other forms of
energy we use in everyday life. Students apply their understanding of the various Earth systems (geosphere, hydrosphere, atmosphere,
biosphere) and how they interact with each other and heat from the Sun. Students understand how geological systems change and shape
the planet and provide resources. Students also develop an understanding of how Earth processes and human interactions positively and
negatively that can change environments impacting the ability for organisms to survive. Student investigations focus on collecting and
making sense of observational data and simple measurements using the science and engineering practices: ask questions and define
problems, develop and use models, plan and carry out investigations, analyze and interpret data, use mathematics and computational
thinking, construct explanations and design solutions, engage in argument from evidence, and obtain, evaluate, and communicate
information. While individual lessons may include connections to any of the crosscutting concepts, the standards in fourth grade focus on
helping students understand phenomena through systems and system models, energy and matter, and stability and change.
 Core Ideas for Knowing Science*                                                                         Core Ideas for Using Science*
 Physical Science                                                                                         U1: Scientists explain phenomena using
   P1: All matter in the Universe is made of very small particles.                                            evidence obtained from observations and
   P2: Objects can affect other objects at a distance.                                                        or scientific investigations. Evidence may
   P3: Changing the movement of an object requires a net force to be acting on it.                            lead to developing models and or
   P4: The total amount of energy in a closed system is always the same but can be transferred                theories to make sense of phenomena.
        from one energy store to another during an event.                                                     As new evidence is discovered, models
 Earth and Space Science
                                                                                                              and theories can be revised.
   E1: The composition of the Earth and its atmosphere and the natural and human processes
                                                                                                          U2: The knowledge produced by science is
        occurring within them shape the Earth’s surface and its climate.
                                                                                                              used in engineering and technologies to
   E2: The Earth and our solar system are a very small part of one of many galaxies within the
        Universe.                                                                                             solve problems and/or create products.
 Life Science                                                                                             U3: Applications of science often have both
   L1: Organisms are organized on a cellular basis and have a finite life span.                               positive and negative ethical, social,
   L2: Organisms require a supply of energy and materials for which they often depend on, or                  economic, and/or political implications.
        compete with, other organisms.
   L3: Genetic information is passed down from one generation of organisms to another.
   L4: The unity and diversity of organisms, living and extinct, is the result of evolution.
   *Adapted from Working with Big Ideas in Science Education2
Arizona Department of Education                                            Page| 20            Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                      Arizona Science Standards
Physical Sciences: Students develop an understanding of how Earth’s resources can be transformed into different forms of
energy. Students develop a better understanding of electricity and magnetism.
 Physical Science Standards                                 Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 4.P4U1.1                                                   Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                            Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and System
 Develop and use a model to demonstrate how a system        Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and Change4
 transfers energy from one object to another even when the
 objects are not touching.                                  Background Information:
                                                            Energy is present whenever there are moving objects, sound, light, or heat. When objects
                                                            collide, energy can be transferred from one object to another, thereby changing their motion.
 4.P4U1.2                                                   In such collisions, some energy is typically also transferred to the surrounding air; as a result,
                                                            the air gets heated and sound is produced. Light also transfers energy from place to place. For
 Develop and use a model that explains how energy is        example, energy radiated from the sun is transferred to Earth by light. When this light is
 moved from place to place through electric currents.       absorbed, it warms Earth’s land, air, and water and facilitates plant growth. Energy can also be
                                                            transferred from place to place by electric currents, which can then be used locally to produce
                                                            motion, sound, heat, or light. The currents may have been produced to begin with by
                                                            transforming the energy of motion into electrical energy (e.g., moving water driving a spinning
                                                            turbine which generates electric currents). 4 (p. 125) The faster a given object is moving, the more
 4.P2U1.3                                                   energy it possesses. Energy can be moved from place to place by moving objects or through
                                                            sound or light. (Boundary: At this grade level, no attempt is made to give a precise or complete
 Develop and use a model to demonstrate magnetic            definition of energy.)4(p.122) For example, energy radiated from the sun is transferred to Earth
 forces.                                                    by light. When this light is absorbed, it warms Earth’s land, air, and water and facilitates plant
                                                            growth.4(p.125) The expression “produce energy” typically refers to the conversion of stored
                                                            energy into a desired form for practical use—for example, the stored energy of water behind a
                                                            dam is released so that it flows downhill and drives a turbine generator to produce electricity.
 4.P4U3.4                                                   Food and fuel also release energy when they are digested or burned. When machines or
                                                            animals “use” energy (e.g., to move around), most often the energy is transferred to heat the
 Engage in argument from evidence on the use and            surrounding environment. The energy released by burning fuel or digesting food was once
 impact of renewable and nonrenewable resources to          energy from the sun that was captured by plants in the chemical process that forms plant
                                                            matter (from air and water). (Boundary: The fact that plants capture energy from sunlight is
 generate electricity.                                      introduced at this grade level, but details of photosynthesis are not.) It is important to be able
                                                            to concentrate energy so that it is available for use where and when it is needed. For example,
                                                            batteries are physically transportable energy storage devices, whereas electricity generated
                                                            by power plants is transferred from place to place through distribution systems. 4 (p. 129)
Arizona Department of Education                            Page| 21                        Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                        Arizona Science Standards
Earth and Space Sciences: Students develop an understanding of the different Earth systems and how they interact with each
other. They understand how geological systems change and shape Earth and the evidence that is used to understand these
changes. They also understand how weather, climate, and human interactions can impact the environment.
 Earth and Space Standards                                      Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 4.E1U1.5                                                       Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                                Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Use models to explain seismic waves and their effect on the    System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 Earth.                                                         Change4
                                                                Background Information:
                                                                Waves of the same type can differ in amplitude (height of the wave) and wavelength
                                                                (spacing between wave peaks). Waves can add or cancel one another as they cross,
 4.E1U1.6                                                       depending on their relative phase (i.e., relative position of peaks and troughs of the
                                                                waves), but they emerge unaffected by each other. (Boundary: The discussion at this
 Plan and carry out an investigation to explore and explain     grade level is qualitative only; it can be based on the fact that two different sounds can
 the interactions between Earth’s major systems and the         pass a location in different directions without getting mixed up.) Earthquakes cause
 impact on Earth’s surface materials and processes.             seismic waves, which are waves of motion in Earth’s crust. Earth’s major systems are
                                                                the geosphere (solid and molten rock, soil, and sediments), the hydrosphere (water
                                                                and ice), the atmosphere (air), and the biosphere (living things, including humans).
                                                                These systems interact in multiple ways to affect Earth’s surface materials and
                                                                processes. The ocean supports a variety of ecosystems and organisms, shapes
                                                                landforms, and influences climate. Winds and clouds in the atmosphere interact with
 4.E1U1.7                                                       the landforms to determine patterns of weather. Rainfall helps shape the land and
                                                                affects the types of living things found in a region. Water, ice, wind, living organisms,
 Develop and/or revise a model using various rock types,        and gravity break rocks, soils, and sediments into smaller particles and move them
                                                                around. Human activities affect Earth’s systems and their interactions at its surface. 4
 fossil location, and landforms to show evidence that Earth’s   (p. 181) Earth has changed over time. Understanding how landforms develop, are
 surface has changed over time.                                 weathered (broken down into smaller pieces), and erode (get transported
                                                                elsewhere) can help infer the history of the current landscape. Local, regional, and
                                                                global patterns of rock formations reveal changes over time due to Earth forces, such
                                                                as earthquakes. The presence and location of certain fossil types indicate the order
 4.E1U1.8                                                       in which rock layers were formed. 4 (p. 178) Weather is the minute-by-minute to day-by-
                                                                day variation of the atmosphere’s condition on a local scale. Scientists record the
 Collect, analyze, and interpret data to explain weather        patterns of the weather across different times and areas so that they can make
                                                                predictions about what kind of weather might happen next. Climate describes the
 and climate patterns.                                          ranges of an area’s typical weather conditions and the extent to which those conditions
                                                                vary over years to centuries. 4 (p. 188)
Arizona Department of Education                               Page| 22                       Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                         Arizona Science Standards
 4.E1U3.9                                                        Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Construct and support an evidence-based argument                Crosscutting Concepts:
 about the availability of water and its impact on life.         Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
                                                                 System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                                 Change4
 4.E1U2.10                                                       Background Information:
                                                                 Water is found almost everywhere on Earth: as vapor; as fog or clouds in the
                                                                 atmosphere; as rain or snow falling from clouds; as ice, snow, and running water on
 Define problem(s) and design solution(s) to minimize the        land and in the ocean; and as groundwater beneath the surface. The downhill
 effects of natural hazards.                                     movement of water as it flows to the ocean shapes the appearance of the land. Nearly
                                                                 all of Earth’s available water is in the ocean. Most freshwater is in glaciers or
                                                                 underground; only a tiny fraction is in streams, lakes, wetlands, and the atmosphere. 4
                                                                 (p. 185) A variety of hazards result from natural processes (e.g., earthquakes, tsunamis,
                                                                 volcanic eruptions, severe weather, floods, coastal erosion). Humans cannot eliminate
                                                                 natural hazards but can take steps to reduce their impacts. 4 (p. 193)
Life Sciences: Students develop an understanding of the diversity of past and present organisms, factors impacting organism
diversity, and evidence of change of organisms over time.
 Life Science Standards                                        Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 4.L4U1.11                                                     Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                               Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Analyze and interpret environmental data to                   System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 demonstrate that species either adapt and survive or go       Change4
 extinct over time.
                                                               Background Information:
                                                               When the environment changes in ways that affect a place’s physical characteristics,
                                                               temperature, or availability of resources, some organisms survive and reproduce,
                                                               others move to new locations, yet others move into the transformed environment, and
                                                               some die. 4 (p. 155) Fossils provide evidence about the types of organisms (both visible and
                                                               microscopic) that lived long ago and also about the nature of their environments. Fossils
                                                               can be compared with one another and to living organisms according to their similarities
                                                               and differences. 4 (p. 162) Changes in an organism’s habitat are sometimes beneficial to it
                                                               and sometimes harmful. For any particular environment, some kinds of organisms
                                                               survive well, some survive less well, and some cannot survive at all. 4 (p. 165)
Arizona Department of Education                               Page| 23                         Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                     Arizona Science Standards
                                Fifth Grade: Patterns; Scale, Proportion, and Quantity
By the end of fifth grade, students apply their understanding of scale at macro (time and space) and micro (particles of matter) levels to
understand patterns and scale across life, earth and space, and physical sciences. Students will develop an understanding of forces,
conservation of matter, and that genetic information can be passed down from parent to offspring. Student investigations focus on collecting
and making sense of observational data and measurements using the science and engineering practices: ask questions and define problems,
develop and use models, plan and carry out investigations, analyze and interpret data, use mathematics and computational thinking,
construct explanations and design solutions, engage in argument from evidence, and obtain, evaluate, and communicate information. While
individual lessons may include connections to any of the crosscutting concepts, the standards in fifth grade focus on helping students
understand phenomena through patterns and scale, proportion and quantity.
 Core Ideas for Knowing Science*                                                                         Core Ideas for Using Science*
 Physical Science                                                                                         U1: Scientists explain phenomena using
   P1: All matter in the Universe is made of very small particles.                                            evidence obtained from observations and
   P2: Objects can affect other objects at a distance.                                                        or scientific investigations. Evidence may
   P3: Changing the movement of an object requires a net force to be acting on it.                            lead to developing models and or
   P4: The total amount of energy in a closed system is always the same but can be transferred                theories to make sense of phenomena.
        from one energy store to another during an event.                                                     As new evidence is discovered, models
 Earth and Space Science
                                                                                                              and theories can be revised.
   E1: The composition of the Earth and its atmosphere and the natural and human processes
                                                                                                          U2: The knowledge produced by science is
        occurring within them shape the Earth’s surface and its climate.
                                                                                                              used in engineering and technologies to
   E2: The Earth and our solar system are a very small part of one of many galaxies within the
        Universe.                                                                                             solve problems and/or create products.
 Life Science                                                                                             U3: Applications of science often have both
   L1: Organisms are organized on a cellular basis and have a finite life span.                               positive and negative ethical, social,
   L2: Organisms require a supply of energy and materials for which they often depend on, or                  economic, and/or political implications.
        compete with, other organisms.
   L3: Genetic information is passed down from one generation of organisms to another.
   L4: The unity and diversity of organisms, living and extinct, is the result of evolution.
   *Adapted from Working with Big Ideas in Science Education2
Arizona Department of Education                                            Page| 24            Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                          Arizona Science Standards
Physical Sciences: Students develop an understanding that changes can occur to matter/objects on Earth or in space, but both
energy and matter follow the pattern of being conserved during those changes.
 Physical Science Standards                                     Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 5.P1U1.1                                                       Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                                Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Analyze and interpret data to explain that matter of any       System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 type can be subdivided into particles too small to see and,    Change4
 in a closed system, if properties change or chemical
 reactions occur, the amount of matter stays the same.          Background Information:
                                                                Matter of any type can be subdivided into particles that are too small to see, but even
                                                                then, the matter still exists and can be detected by other means (e.g., by weighing or by
                                                                its effects on other objects). For example, a model showing that gases are made from
                                                                matter particles that are too small to see and are moving freely around in space can
 5.P1U1.2                                                       explain many observations, including the inflation and shape of a balloon; the effects of
                                                                air on larger particles or objects (e.g., leaves in wind, dust suspended in air); and the
 Plan and carry out investigations to demonstrate that          appearance of visible scale water droplets in condensation, fog, and, by extension, also in
                                                                clouds or the contrails of a jet. The amount (weight) of matter is conserved when it
 some substances combine to form new substances with            changes form, even in transitions in which it seems to vanish (e.g., sugar in solution,
 different properties and others can be mixed without           evaporation in a closed container). Measurements of a variety of properties (e.g.,
 taking on new properties.                                      hardness, reflectivity) can be used to identify particular materials. (Boundary: At this
                                                                grade level, mass and weight are not distinguished, and no attempt is made to define the
                                                                unseen particles or explain the atomic-scale mechanism of evaporation and
                                                                condensation.) 4 (p. 108) When two or more different substances are mixed, a new
                                                                substance with different properties may be formed; such occurrences depend on the
                                                                substances and the temperature. No matter what reaction or change in properties
                                                                occurs, the total weight of the substances does not change. (Boundary: Mass and weight
                                                                are not distinguished at this grade level.) 4 (pp. 110-111) Other substances simply mix
                                                                without changing permanently and can often be separated again. At room temperature,
                                                                some substances are in the solid state, some in the liquid state and some in the gas state.
                                                                The state of many substances can be changed by heating or cooling them. The amount
                                                                of matter does not change when a solid melts or a liquid evaporates. 2 (p. 20)
Arizona Department of Education                                Page| 25                        Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                         Arizona Science Standards
 5.P2U1.3                                                      Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Construct an explanation using evidence to demonstrate        Crosscutting Concepts:
 that objects can affect other objects even when they are      Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 not touching.                                                 System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                               Change4
                                                               Background Information:
                                                               Gravity is the universal attraction between all objects, however large or small,
                                                               although it is only apparent when one of the objects is very large. This gravitational
                                                               attraction keeps the planets in orbit around the Sun, the Moon round the Earth and
                                                               their moons round other planets. On the Earth it results in everything being pulled down
                                                               towards the center of the Earth. We call this downward attraction the weight of an
                                                               object. 2 (p. 21) Objects in contact exert forces on each other (friction, elastic pushes and
                                                               pulls). Electric, magnetic, and gravitational forces between a pair of objects do not
                                                               require that the objects be in contact-for example, magnets push pull at a distance. 4 (117)
 5.P3U1.4                                                      Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Obtain, analyze, and communicate evidence of the              Crosscutting Concepts:
 effects that balanced and unbalanced forces have on the       Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 motion of objects.                                            System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                               Change4
                                                               Background Information:
                                                               Each force acts on one particular object and has both a strength and a direction. An
 5.P3U2.5                                                      object at rest typically has multiple forces acting on it, but they add to give zero net
                                                               force on the object. Forces that do not sum to zero can cause changes in the object’s
 Define problems and design solutions pertaining to            speed or direction of motion. (Boundary: Qualitative and conceptual, but not
 force and motion.                                             quantitative addition of forces are used at this level.) The patterns of an object’s motion
                                                               in various situations can be observed and measured; when past motion exhibits a
                                                               regular pattern, future motion can be predicted from it. (Boundary: Technical terms,
                                                               such as magnitude, velocity, momentum, and vector quantity, are not introduced at this
                                                               level, but the concept that some quantities need both size and direction to be described
                                                               is developed.)4 (p. 115) How quickly an object’s motion is changed depends on the force
                                                               acting and the object’s mass. The greater the mass of an object, the longer it takes to
                                                               speed it up or slow it down, a property of mass described as inertia. 2 (p. 22)
Arizona Department of Education                               Page| 26                          Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                   Arizona Science Standards
 5.P4U1.6                                                Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Analyze and interpret data to determine how and where   Crosscutting Concepts:
 energy is transferred when objects move.                Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
                                                         System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                         Change4
                                                         Background Information:
                                                         The faster a given object is moving, the more energy it possesses. Energy can be moved
                                                         from place to place by moving objects or through sound, light, or electric currents.
                                                         (Boundary: At this grade level, no attempt is made to give a precise or complete definition
                                                         of energy.)4 (p. 122) Energy is present whenever there are moving objects, sound, light, or
                                                         heat. When objects collide, energy can be transferred from one object to another,
                                                         thereby changing their motion. In such collisions, some energy is typically also
                                                         transferred to the surrounding air; as a result, the air gets heated and sound is produced.
                                                         Light also transfers energy from place to place. For example, energy radiated from the
                                                         sun is transferred to Earth by light. When this light is absorbed, it warms Earth’s land,
                                                         air, and water and facilitates plant growth. Energy can also be transferred from place to
                                                         place by electric currents, which can then be used locally to produce motion, sound, heat,
                                                         or light. The currents may have been produced to begin with by transforming the energy
                                                         of motion into electrical energy (e.g., moving water driving a spinning turbine which
                                                         generates electric currents). 4 (p. 125)
Arizona Department of Education                         Page| 27                         Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                         Arizona Science Standards
Earth and Space Sciences: Students develop an understanding of the how gravitational forces in space cause observable patterns
due to the position of Earth, Sun, Moon, and stars.
 Earth and Space Standards                                     Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 5.E2U1.7                                                      Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                               Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Develop, revise, and use models based on evidence to          System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 construct explanations about the movement of the Earth        Change4
 and Moon within our solar system.
                                                               Background Information:
                                                               The Earth moves round the Sun taking about a year for one orbit. The Moon orbits the
                                                               Earth taking about four weeks to complete an orbit. The Sun, at the center of the solar
                                                               system, is the only object in the solar system that is a source of visible light. The Moon
                                                               reflects light from the Sun and as it moves round the Earth only those parts illuminated
                                                               by the Sun are seen. The Earth rotates about an axis lying north to south and this motion
                                                               makes it appear that the Sun, Moon and stars are moving round the Earth.
                                                               The orbits of Earth around the sun and of the moon around Earth, together with the
                                                               rotation of Earth about an axis between its North and South poles, cause observable
                                                               patterns. Some objects in the solar system can be seen with the naked eye. Planets in the
                                                               night sky change positions and are not always visible from Earth as they orbit the sun.
                                                               Stars appear in patterns called constellations, which can be used for navigation and
                                                               appear to move together across the sky because of Earth’s rotation. 4 (p. 176)
 5.E2U1.8                                                      Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Obtain, analyze, and communicate evidence to support          Crosscutting Concepts:
 an explanation that the gravitational force of Earth on       Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 objects is directed toward the planet’s center.               System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                               Change4
                                                               Background Information:
                                                               Gravity is the universal attraction between all objects, however large or small, although
                                                               it is only apparent when one of the objects is very large. On the Earth it results in
                                                               everything being pulled down towards the center of the Earth. We call this downward
                                                               attraction the weight of an object. 2 (p. 21)
                                                               The gravitational force of Earth acting on an object near Earth’s surface pulls that object
                                                               toward the planet’s center. 4 (p. 117)
Arizona Department of Education                               Page| 28                      Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                         Arizona Science Standards
Life Sciences: Students develop an understanding of patterns and how genetic information is passed from generation to
generation. They also develop the understanding of how genetic information and environmental features impact the survival of
an organism.
 Life Science Standards                                        Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 5.L3U1.9                                                      Crosscutting Concepts:
                                                               Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 Obtain, evaluate, and communicate information about           System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
 patterns between the offspring of plants, and the offspring   Change4
 of animals (including humans); construct an explanation
 of how genetic information is passed from one generation      Background Information:
                                                               Many characteristics of organisms are inherited from their parents. Other
 to the next.                                                  characteristics result from individuals’ interactions with the environment, which can
                                                               range from diet to learning. Many characteristics involve both inheritance and
                                                               environment. 4 (p. 158) The environment also affects the traits that an organism develops—
                                                               differences in where they grow or in the food they consume may cause organisms that
                                                               are related to end up looking or behaving differently. 4 (p. 158) When the environment
                                                               changes in ways that affect a place’s physical characteristics, temperature, or availability
                                                               of resources, some organisms survive and reproduce, others move to new locations, yet
                                                               others move into the transformed environment, and some die. 4 (p. 155) Offspring acquire
                                                               a mix of traits from their biological parents. Different organisms vary in how they look
                                                               and function because they have different inherited information. In each kind of organism
 5.L3U1.10                                                     there is variation in the traits themselves, and different kinds of organisms may have
                                                               different versions of the trait. The environment also affects the traits that an organism
                                                               develops—differences in where they grow or in the food they consume may cause
 Construct an explanation based on evidence that the           organisms that are related to end up looking or behaving differently. 4 (p. 160)
 changes in an environment can affect the development of
 the traits in a population of organisms.
Arizona Department of Education                               Page| 29                        Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                       Arizona Science Standards
 5.L4U3.11                                                   Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Obtain, evaluate, and communicate evidence about how Crosscutting Concepts:
 natural and human-caused changes to habitats or climate     Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 can impact populations.                                     System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                             Change4
                                                             Background Information:
                                                             Changes in an organism’s habitat are sometimes beneficial to it and sometimes harmful.
                                                             For any particular environment, some kinds of organisms survive well, some survive less
                                                             well, and some cannot survive at all.4 (p. 165) Scientists have identified and classified many
                                                             plants and animals. Populations of organisms live in a variety of habitats and change in
                                                             those habitats affects the organisms living there. Humans, like all other organisms, obtain
                                                             living and nonliving resources from their environments. 4 (p. 165)
 5.L4U3.12                                                   Crosscutting Concepts & Background Information for Educators
 Construct an argument based on evidence that                Crosscutting Concepts:
 inherited characteristics can be affected by behavior       Patterns, Cause and Effect, Scale, Proportion and Quantity; Systems and
 and/or environmental conditions.                            System Models; Energy and Matter; Structure and Function; Stability and
                                                             Change4
                                                             Background Information:
                                                             Sometimes the differences in characteristics between individuals of the same
                                                             species provide advantages in surviving, finding mates, and reproducing.
                                                             Many characteristics of organisms are inherited from their parents. Other
                                                             characteristics result from individuals’ interactions with the environment,
                                                             which can range from diet to learning. Many characteristics involve both
                                                             inheritance and environment. 4 (p. 158)
Arizona Department of Education                             Page| 30                       Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                             Arizona Science Standards
Distribution of Grades 3-5 Standards
                                                                        U1: Scientists explain phenomena using         U2: The knowledge produced by      U3: Applications of science
                                                                        evidence obtained from observations and or     science is used in engineering and often have both positive and
                                                                        scientific investigations. Evidence may lead   technologies to create products.   negative ethical, social,
                                                                        to developing models and or theories to                                           economic, and political
                                                                        make sense of phenomena. As new evidence                                          implications.
                                                                        is discovered, models and theories can be
                                                                        revised.
 P1: All matter in the Universe is made of very small particles.        5.P1U1.1
                                                                        5.P1U1.2
 P2: Objects can affect other objects at a distance.                    3.P2U1.1                  5.P2U1.3
                                                                        3.P2U1.2
                                                                        4.P2U1.3
 P3: Changing the movement of an object requires a net force to be      5.P3U1.4                                       5.P3U2.5
 acting on it.
 P4: The total amount of energy in a closed system is always the        3.P4U1.3                            5.P4U1.6                                      4.P4U3.4
 same but can be transferred from one energy store to another           4.P4U1.1
 during an event.                                                       4.P4U1.2
 E1: The composition of the Earth and its atmosphere and the            3.E1U1.4                            4.E1U1.7   4.E1U2.10                          4.E1U3.9
 natural and human processes occurring within them shape the            4.E1U1.5                            4.E1U1.8
 Earth’s surface and its climate.                                       4.E1U1.6
 E2: The Earth and our solar system are a very small part of one of     5.E2U1.7
 many galaxies within the Universe.                                     5.E2U1.8
 L1: Organisms are organized on a cellular basis and have a finite life 3.L1U1.5
 span.
 L2: Organisms require a supply of energy and materials for which       3.L2U1.6
 they often depend on, or compete with, other organisms.                3.L2U1.7
                                                                        3.L2U1.8
 L3: Genetic information is passed down from one generation of          5.L3U1.9
 organisms to another.                                                  5.L3U1.10
 L4: The unity and diversity of organisms, living and extinct, is the   4.L4U1.11                                                                         5.L4U3.11
 result of evolution.                                                                                                                                     5.L4U3.12
Arizona Department of Education                                                     Page| 31                     Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                           Arizona Science Standards
                                                               Appendices
Appendix 1: Crosscutting Concepts
The seven crosscutting concepts bridge disciplinary boundaries and unite core ideas throughout the fields of science and engineering.
Their purpose is to help students deepen their understanding of the core ideas in the standards and develop a coherent and scientifically
based view of the world. Students should make explicit connections between their learning and the crosscutting concepts within each
grade level.
These concepts also bridge the boundaries between science and other disciplines. As educators focus on crosscutting concepts, they
should look for ways to integrate them into other disciplines. For example, patterns are highly prevalent in language. Indeed, phonics, an
evidence-based literacy instructional strategy, is specifically designed to assist students in recognizing patterns in language. By actively
incorporating these types of opportunities, educators assist students in building connections across content areas to deepen and extend
learning.
The crosscutting concepts and their progressions from Chapter 4 Crosscutting concepts pages 83 - 102 in A Framework for K-12 Science
Education4 are summarized below.
 Patterns: Observed patterns of forms and events guide organization and classification and prompt questions about
 relationships and the factors that influence them.
 Patterns are often a first step in organizing and asking scientific and engineering questions. In science, classification is one
 example of recognizing patterns of similarity and diversity. In engineering, patterns of system failures may lead to design
 improvements. Assisting children with pattern recognition facilitates learning causing the brain to search for meaning in real-
 world phenomena.1 Pattern recognition progresses from broad similarities and differences in young children to more detailed,
 scientific descriptors in upper elementary. Middle school students recognize patterns on both the micro- and macroscopic levels,
 and high school students understand that patterns vary in a system depending upon the scale at which the system is studied.
 Cause and effect: Events have causes, sometimes simple, sometimes multifaceted. A major activity of both science and
 engineering is investigating and explaining causal relationships and the mechanisms by which they are mediated. Such
 mechanisms can then be tested across given contexts and used to predict and explain events in new contexts.
 Like patterns, a child’s ability to recognize cause and effect relationships progresses as they age. In the early grades, students
 build upon their understanding of patterns to investigate the causes of these patterns. They may wonder what caused one seed
 to grow faster than another one and design a test to gather evidence. By upper elementary, students should routinely be asking
 questions related to cause and effect. In middle school, students begin challenging others’ explanations about causes through
 scientific argumentation. High school continues this trend while students expand their investigation into mechanisms that may
Arizona Department of Education                                  Page| 32                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                     Arizona Science Standards
 have multiple mediating factors such as changes in ecosystems over time or mechanisms that work in some systems but not in
 others.
 Scale, proportion, and quantity: In considering phenomena, it is critical to recognize what is relevant at different
 measures of size, time, and energy and to recognize how changes in scale, proportion, or quantity affect a system’s
 structure or performance.
 There are two major scales from which we study science: directly observable and those processes which required tools or
 scientific measurement to be quantified and studied. To understand scale, students must understand both measurement and
 orders of magnitude. Understanding of scale, proportion, and quantity will progress as children get older. Young children
 engage in relative measures such as hotter/colder, bigger/smaller, or older/younger without referring to a specific unit of
 measure. As students age, it is important that they recognize the need for a common unit of measure to make a judgement of
 scale, proportion, and quantity. Elementary students start building this knowledge through length measurements and gradually
 progress to weight, time, temperature or other variables. Intersection with key mathematical concepts is vital to help students
 develop the ability to assign meaning to ratios and proportions when discussing scale, proportion, and quantity in science and
 engineering. By middle and high school, students apply this knowledge to algebraic thinking and are able to change variables,
 understand both linear and exponential growth, and engage in complex mathematical and statistical relationships.
 Systems and system models: Because the world is too large and complex to comprehend all at once, students must
 define the system under study, specify its boundaries, and make explicit a model of that system provides tools for
 understanding and testing ideas that are applicable throughout science and engineering.
 Models of systems can also be useful in conveying information about that system to others. Many engineering designs start with
 system models as a way to predict outcomes and test theories prior to final development ensuring that interactions between
 system parts and subsystems are understood. As students age, their ability to analyze and predict outcomes strengthens. In the
 early grades, students should be asked to express systems thinking through drawings, diagrams, or oral explanations noting
 relationships between parts. Additionally, even at a young age, students can be asked to develop plans for their actions or sets of
 instructions to help them develop the concept that others should be able to understand and use them. As student’s age, they
 should incorporate more facets of the system including those facets which are not visible such as energy flow. By high school,
 students can identify the assumptions and approximations that went into making the system model and discuss how these
 assumptions and approximations limit the precision and reliability of predictions.
 Energy and matter: Tracking fluxes of energy and matter into, out of, and within systems helps one understand the
 systems’ possibilities and limitations.
Arizona Department of Education                           Page| 33              Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                       Arizona Science Standards
 The concept of conservation of energy within a closed system is complex and prone to misunderstanding. As a result, students in
 early elementary are only very generally exposed to the concept of energy. In the early grades, focus on the recognition of
 conservation of matter within a system and the flow of matter between systems builds the basis for understanding more
 complex energy concepts in later grades. In middle school and high school, students develop a deeper understanding of this
 concept through chemical reactions and atomic structure. In high school, nuclear processes are introduced along with
 conservation laws related specifically to nuclear processes.
 Structure and function: The way in which an object or living thing is shaped and its substructure determines many of its
 properties and functions.
 Knowledge of structure and function is essential to successful design. As such, it is important that students begin an
 investigation of structure and function at an early age. In early grades, this study takes the form of how shape and stability are
 related for different structures: braces make a bridge stronger, a deeper bowl holds more water. In upper elementary and
 middle school, students begin an investigation of structures that are not visible to the naked eye: how the structure of water and
 salt molecules relate to solubility, the shape of the continents and plate tectonics. In high school students apply their knowledge
 of the relationship of structure to function when investigating the structure of the heart and the specific function it performs.
 Stability and change: For natural and built systems alike, conditions of stability and determinants of rates of change or
 evolution of a system are critical elements of study.
 When systems are stable, small disturbances fade away, and the system returns to the stable condition. In maintaining a stable
 system, whether it is a natural system or a human design, feedback loops are an essential element. Young children experiment
 with stability and change as they build with blocks or chart growth. As they experiment with these concepts, the educator should
 assist them in building associated language and vocabulary as well as learning to question why some things change, and others
 stay the same. In middle school, understanding of stability and change extends beyond those phenomena which are easily visible
 to more subtle form of stability and change. By high school, students bring in their knowledge of historical events to explain
 stability and change over long periods of time, and they also recognize that multiple factors may feed into these concepts of
 stability and change.
Arizona Department of Education                             Page| 34              Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                          Arizona Science Standards
Appendix 2: Science and Engineering Practices
The science and engineering practices describe how scientists investigate and build models and theories of the natural world or how
engineers design and build systems. They reflect science and engineering as they are practiced and experienced. As students conduct
investigations, they engage in multiple practices as they gather information to solve problems, answer their questions, reason about how
the data provide evidence to support their understanding and then communicate their understanding of phenomena. Student
investigations may be observational, experimental, use models or simulations, or use data from other sources. These eight practices
identified in Chapter 4 of A Framework for K-12 Science Education4 are critical components of scientific literacy. They are not instructional
strategies.
                                              Distinguishing Science & Engineering Practices
                                                Science                                                     Engineering
   Ask Questions      Science often begins with a question about a                 Engineering begins with a problem, need, or desire that
     and Define       phenomenon, such as “Why is the sky blue?” or “What          suggests a problem that needs to be solved. A problem
      Problems        causes cancer?” and seeks to develop theories that can       such as reducing the nation’s dependence on fossil fuels
                      provide explanatory answers to such questions. Scientists    may produce multiple engineering problems like
                      formulate empirically answerable questions about             designing efficient transportation systems or improved
                      phenomena; they establish what is already known and          solar cells. Engineers ask questions to define the problem,
                      determine what questions have yet to be satisfactorily       determine criteria for a successful solution, and identify
                      answered.                                                    constraints.
    Develop and       Science often involves constructing and using a variety of   Engineering uses models and simulations to analyze
     Use Models       models and simulations to help develop explanations          existing systems to see where flaws might occur or to test
                      about natural phenomena. Models make it possible to go       viable solutions to a new problem. Engineers use models
                      beyond what can be observed. Models enable predictions       of various sorts to test proposed systems and to
                      to be made to test hypothetical explanations.                recognize the strengths and limitations of their designs.
   Plan and Carry     Scientific investigations may be conducted in the field or   Engineers use investigations to gather data essential for
         Out          the laboratory. Scientists plan and carry out systematic     specifying design criteria or parameters and to test their
   Investigations     investigations that require the identification of what is to designs. Engineers must identify relevant variables,
                      be recorded and, if applicable, what are to be treated as    decide how they will be measured, and collect data for
                      the dependent and independent variables. Observations        analysis. Their investigations help them to identify how
                      and data collected are used to test existing theories and    effective, efficient, and durable their designs may be
                      explanations or to revise and develop new ones.              under a range of conditions.
Arizona Department of Education                                 Page| 35               Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                         Arizona Science Standards
    Analyze and     Scientific investigations produce data that must be            Engineers analyze data collected during the tests of their
   Interpret Data   analyzed to derive meaning. Because data usually do not        designs and investigations; this allows them to compare
                    speak for themselves, scientists use a range of tools,         different solutions and determine how well each one
                    including tabulation, graphical interpretation,                meets specific design criteria; that is, which design best
                    visualization, and statistical analysis, to identify           solves the problem within the given constraints.
                    significant features and patterns in the data, sources of      Engineers require a range of tools to identify the major
                    error, and the calculated degree of certainty. Technology      patterns and interpret the results.
                    makes collecting large data sets easier providing many
                    secondary sources for analysis.
         Use        In science, mathematics and computation are                    In engineering, mathematical and computational
    Mathematics     fundamental tools for representing physical variables and      representations of established relationships and
         and        their relationships. They are used for a range of tasks:       principles are a fundamental part of design. For example,
   Computational    constructing simulations, statistically analyzing data, and    structural engineers create mathematically based
      Thinking      recognizing, expressing, and applying quantitative             analyses of designs to calculate whether they can stand
                    relationships. Mathematical and computational                  up to the expected stresses of use and if they can be
                    approaches enable the behavior of physical systems to be       completed within acceptable budgets. Simulations of
                    predicted and tested. Statistical techniques are invaluable    designs provide an effective test bed for the development.
                    for assessing the significance of patterns or correlations.
      Construct     In science, theories are constructed to provide                Engineering design is a systematic process for solving
    Explanations    explanatory accounts of phenomena. A theory becomes            engineering problems and is based on scientific
     and Design     accepted when it has been shown to be superior to other        knowledge and models of the material world. Each
      Solutions     explanations in the breadth of phenomena it accounts for       proposed solution results from a process of balancing
                    and in its explanatory coherence. Scientific explanations      competing criteria of desired functions, feasibility, cost,
                    are explicit applications of theory to a specific situation or safety, aesthetics, and compliance with legal
                    phenomenon, perhaps with a theory-based model for the          requirements. There is usually no single best solution but
                    system under study. The goal for students is to construct      rather a range of solutions. The optimal solution often
                    logically coherent explanations of phenomena that              depends on the criteria used for making evaluations.
                    incorporate their current understanding of science, or a
                    model that represents it, and are consistent with the
                    available evidence.
      Engage in     In science, reasoning and argument are essential for           In engineering, reasoning and argument are essential for
   Argument from identifying the strengths and weaknesses of a line of             finding the best possible solution to a problem. Engineers
      Evidence      thinking and for finding the best explanation for a            collaborate with their peers throughout the design
Arizona Department of Education                                 Page| 36                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                         Arizona Science Standards
                    phenomenon. Scientists must defend their explanations,        process, with a critical stage being the selection of the
                    formulate evidence, based on a solid foundation of data,      most promising solution among a field of competing
                    examine their own understanding in light of the evidence      ideas. Engineers use systematic methods to compare
                    and comments offered by others, and collaborate with          alternatives, formulate evidence, based on test data, make
                    peers in searching for the best explanation for the           arguments from evidence to defend their conclusions,
                    phenomenon being investigated.                                evaluate critically the ideas of others, and revise their
                                                                                  designs to achieve the best solution to the problem at
                                                                                  hand.
        Obtain,     Science cannot advance if scientists are unable to            Engineers cannot produce new or improved technologies
    Evaluate, and   communicate their findings clearly and persuasively or to     if the advantages of their designs are not communicated
    Communicate     learn about the findings of others. Scientists need to        clearly and persuasively. Engineers need to express their
     Information    express their ideas, orally and in writing, using tables,     ideas, orally and in writing, using tables, graphs,
                    diagrams, graphs, drawings, equations, or models and by       drawings, or models and by engaging in discussions with
                    engaging in discussions with peers. Scientists need to be     peers. Engineers need to be able to derive meaning from
                    able to derive meaning from texts (such as papers, the        colleagues’ texts, evaluate the information, and apply it
                    internet, symposia, and lectures) to evaluate the scientific  usefully. Engineers routinely use technologies to extend
                    validity of the information and to integrate that             the possibilities for collaboration and communication.
                    information with existing theories or explanations.
                    Scientists routinely use technologies to extend the
                    possibilities for collaboration and communication.
 4Adapted  from Box 3-2, National Research Council. pages 50-53
Arizona Department of Education                               Page| 37                 Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                              Arizona Science Standards
Appendix 3: Core Ideas
The core ideas encompass the content that occurs at each grade and provides the background knowledge for students to develop sense-making around
phenomena. The core ideas center around understanding the causes of phenomena in physical, earth and space, and life science; the principles, theories,
and models that support that understanding; engineering and technological applications; and societal implications. The Arizona Science Standards
integrate learning progressions from A Framework for K-12 Science Education 4 to build a coherent progression of learning for these core ideas from
elementary school through high school. The following thirteen big ideas for knowing science and using science are adapted from Working with Big Ideas
of Science Education2 and represent student understanding of each core idea at the end of high school.
 Core Ideas for Knowing Science
 P1: All matter in the Universe is made         Atoms are the building blocks of all normal matter, living and nonliving. The behavior and
 of very small particles.                       arrangement of the atoms explains the properties of different materials. In chemical
                                                reactions atoms are rearranged to form new substances. Each atom has a nucleus, containing
                                                neutrons and protons, surrounded by electrons. The opposite electric charges of protons and
                                                electrons attract each other, keeping atoms together and accounting for the formation of
                                                some compounds.
 P2: Objects can affect other objects at        All objects have an effect on other objects without being in contact with them. In some cases,
 a distance.                                    the effect travels out from the source to the receiver in the form of radiation such as visible
                                                light. In other cases, action at a distance is explained in terms of the existence of a field of
                                                influence between objects, such as a magnetic, electric, or gravitational field. Gravity is a
                                                universal force of attraction between all objects, however large or small, keeping the planets
                                                in orbit around the Sun and causing terrestrial objects to fall towards the center of the Earth.
 P3: Changing the movement of an                A force acting on an object is not seen directly but is detected by its effect on the object’s
 object requires a net force to be              motion or shape. If an object is not moving, the forces acting on it are equal in size and
 acting on it.                                  opposite in direction, balancing each other. Since gravity affects all objects on Earth, there is
                                                always another force opposing gravity when an object is at rest. Unbalanced forces cause
                                                change in movement in the direction of the net force. When opposing forces acting on an
                                                object are not in the same line they cause the object to turn or twist. This effect is used in
                                                some simple machines.
 P4: The total amount of energy in a            The total amount of energy in the Universe is always the same but can be transferred from
 closed system is always the same but           one energy store to another during an event. Many processes or events involve changes and
 can be transferred from one energy             require an energy source to make them happen. Energy can be transferred from one body or
 store to another during an event.              group of bodies to another in various ways. In these processes, some energy becomes less
                                                easy to use. Energy cannot be created or destroyed.
Arizona Department of Education                                     Page| 38                  Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                      Arizona Science Standards
 E1: The composition of the Earth and   Radiation from the Sun heats the Earth’s surface and causes convection currents in the air
 its atmosphere and the natural and     and oceans creating climates. Below the surface, heat from the Earth’s interior causes
 human processes occurring within       movement in the molten rock. This in turn leads to movement of the plates which form the
 them shape the Earth’s surface and its Earth’s crust, creating volcanoes and earthquakes. The solid surface is constantly changing
 climate.                               through the formation and weathering of rock.
 E2: The Earth and our solar system     Our Sun and eight planets and other smaller objects orbiting it comprise the solar system.
 are a very small part of one of many   Day and night and the seasons are explained by the orientation and rotation of the Earth as it
 galaxies within the Universe.          moves round the Sun. The solar system is part of a galaxy of stars, gas, and dust. It is one of
                                        many billions in the Universe, enormous distances apart. Many stars appear to have planets.
 L1: Organisms are organized on a       All organisms are constituted of one or more cells. Multicellular organisms have cells that
 cellular basis and have a finite life  are differentiated according to their function. All the basic functions of life are the result of
 span.                                  what happens inside the cells which make up an organism. Growth is the result of multiple
                                        cell divisions.
 L2: Organisms require a supply of      Food provides materials and energy for organisms to carry out the basic functions of life and
 energy and materials for which they    to grow. Green plants and some bacteria are able to use energy from the Sun to generate
 often depend on, or compete with,      complex food molecules. Animals obtain energy by breaking down complex food molecules
 other organisms.                       and are ultimately dependent on producers as their source of energy. In any ecosystem,
                                        there is competition among species for the energy resources and materials they need to live
                                        and reproduce.
 L3: Genetic information is passed      Genetic information in a cell is held in the chemical DNA. Genes determine the development
 down from one generation of            and structure of organisms. In asexual reproduction all the genes in the offspring come from
 organisms to another.                  one parent. In sexual reproduction half of the genes come from each parent.
 L4: The unity and diversity of         All life today is directly descended from a universal common ancestor. Over countless
 organisms, living and extinct, is the  generations changes resulting from natural diversity within a species are believed to lead to
 result of evolution.                   the selection of those individuals best suited to survive under certain conditions. Species not
                                        able to respond sufficiently to changes in their environment become extinct.
Arizona Department of Education                             Page| 39                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                      Arizona Science Standards
 Core Ideas for Using Science
 U1: Scientists explain phenomena       Science’s purpose is to find the cause or causes of phenomena in the natural world.
 using evidence obtained from           Science is a search to explain and understand phenomena in the natural world. There is no
 observations and or scientific         single scientific method for doing this; the diversity of natural phenomena requires a
 investigations. Evidence may lead to   diversity of methods and instruments to generate and test scientific explanations. 2 (p. 30)
 developing models and or theories to   Scientific explanations, theories, and models are those that best fit the evidence
 make sense of phenomena. As new        available at a particular time. A scientific theory or model representing relationships
 evidence is discovered, models and     between variables of a natural phenomenon must fit the observations available at the time
 theories can be revised.               and lead to predictions that can be tested. Any theory or model is provisional and subject to
                                        revision in the light of new data even though it may have led to predictions in accord with
                                        data in the past. 2 (31)
 U2: The knowledge produced by          The use of scientific ideas in engineering and technologies has made considerable changes in
 science is used in engineering and     many aspects of human activity. Advances in technologies enable further scientific activity;
 technologies to solve problems         in turn, this increases understanding of the natural world. In some areas of human activity
 and/or create products.                technology is ahead of scientific ideas, but in others scientific ideas precede technology. 2 (p.
                                        32)
 U3: Applications of science often have The use of scientific knowledge in technologies makes many innovations possible. Whether
 both positive and negative ethical,    particular applications of science are desirable is a matter that cannot be addressed using
 social, economic, and/or political     scientific knowledge alone. Ethical and moral judgments may be needed, based on such
 implications.                          considerations as personal beliefs, justice or equity, human safety, and impacts on people
                                        and the environment. 2 (p. 33)
Arizona Department of Education                            Page| 40                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                    Arizona Science Standards
Appendix 4: Equity & Diversity in Science
All students can and should learn complex science. However, achieving equity in science education is an ongoing challenge. Students from
underrepresented communities often face "opportunity gaps" in their educational experience. Inclusive approaches to science instruction can
reposition youth as meaningful participants in science learning and recognize their science-related assets and those of their communities4.
The science and engineering practices have the potential to be inclusive of students who have traditionally been marginalized in the science classroom
and may not see science as being relevant to their lives or future. These practices support sense-making and language use as students engage in a
classroom culture of discourse6. The science and engineering practices can support bridges between literacy and numeracy needs, which is particularly
helpful for non-dominant groups when addressing multiple "opportunity gaps." By solving problems through engineering in local contexts (gardening,
improving air quality, cleaning water pollution in the community), students gain knowledge of science content, view science as relevant to their lives
and future, and engage in science in socially relevant and transformative ways7. Science teachers need to acquire effective strategies to include all
students regardless of age, racial, ethnic, cultural, linguistic, socioeconomic, and gender backgrounds 3.
Effective teaching strategies3 for attending to equity and diversity for
     ● Economically disadvantaged students include (1) connecting science education to students’ sense of “place” as physical, historical, and
         sociocultural dimensions in their community; (2) applying students’ “funds of knowledge” and cultural practices; and (3) using problem-based
         and project-based science learning centered on authentic questions and activities that matter to students.
     ● Underrepresented racial and ethnic groups include (1) culturally relevant pedagogy, (2) community involvement and social activism, (3)
         multiple representations and multimodal experiences, and (4) school support systems including role models and mentors of similar racial or
         ethnic backgrounds.
     ● Indigenous students include (1) learning and knowing that is land- and place-based, (2) centers (not erases or undermines) their ways of
         knowing, and (3) builds connections between Indigenous and western Science Technology Engineering and Mathematics (STEM), and (4) home
         culture connections8.
     ● Students with disabilities include (1) multiple means of representation, (2) multiple means of action and expression, (3) multiple means of
         engagement, (4) concrete experiences with realia, and (5) scaffolds in problem-based and project-based learning.
     ● English language learners include (1) literacy strategies for all students, (2) language support strategies with English language learners, (3)
         discourse strategies with English language learners, (4) home language support, (5) home culture connections, (6) concrete experiences with
         realia, and (7) scaffolds in problem-based and project-based learning.
     ● Alternative education setting for dropout prevention include (1) structured after-school opportunities, (2) family outreach, (3) life skills
         training, (4) safe learning environment, and (5) individualized academic support.
     ● Girls’ achievement, confidence, and affinity with science include (1) instructional strategies, (2) curricular decisions, and (3) classroom and
         school structure.
     ● Gifted and talented students include (1) different levels of challenge (including differentiation of content), (2) opportunities for self-direction,
         and (3) strategic grouping.
Arizona Department of Education                                          Page| 41                 Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                            Arizona Science Standards
Appendix 5: Interdisciplinary Connections
The crosscutting concepts along with the science and engineering practices provide opportunities for developing strong interdisciplinary
connections across all content areas. Understanding core ideas in science can provide a context for helping students master key
competencies from other content areas. It can also promote essential career readiness skills, including communication, creativity,
collaboration, and critical thinking. This affords all students equitable access to learning and ensures all students are prepared for college,
career, and citizenship.
 English Language Arts
 The science and engineering practices incorporate reasoning skills used in language arts to help students improve mastery and
 understanding in reading, writing, speaking, and listening. The intersections between science and ELA teach students to analyze data,
 model concepts, and strategically use tools through productive talk and shared activity. Evidence-based reasoning is the foundation of
 good scientific practice. Reading, writing, speaking, and listening in science requires an appreciation of the norms and conventions of
 the discipline of science, including understanding the nature of evidence used, an attention to precision and detail, and the capacity to
 make and assess intricate arguments, verbally and orally present findings, synthesize complex information, and follow detailed
 procedures and accounts of events and concepts. To support these disciplinary literacy skills, teachers must foster a classroom culture
 where students think and reason together, connecting around the core ideas, science and engineering practices, and the crosscutting
 concepts.
 Mathematics
 Science is a quantitative discipline, so it is important for educators to ensure that students’ science learning coheres well with their
 understanding of mathematics.5 Mathematics is fundamental to aspects of modeling and evidence-based conclusions. It is essential for
 expressing relationships in quantitative data. The Standards for Mathematical Practice (MP) naturally link to the science and
 engineering practices and multiple crosscutting concepts within the Arizona Science Standards. By incorporating the Arizona
 Mathematics Standards and practices with critical thinking in science instruction, educators provide students with opportunities to
 develop literacy in mathematics instruction. The goal of using mathematical skills and practices in science is to foster a
 deeper conceptual understanding of science.
 Health
 Natural connections between Health and science exist throughout the Standards. The goals of Health being to maintain and improve
 students’ health, prevent disease, and avoid or reduce health-related risk behaviors which can fit within the context of science
 standards.
Arizona Department of Education                                  Page| 42                 Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                            Arizona Science Standards
 Computer Science
 Natural connections between science and computer science exist throughout the Standards, especially in the middle level and in high
 school. As students develop or refine complex models and simulations of natural and designed systems, they can use computer science
 to develop, test, and use mathematical or computational models to generate data. Students can apply computational thinking and coding
 to develop apps or streamline processes for collecting, analyzing, or interpreting data.
 Technology
 Technology is essential in teaching and learning science; it influences the science that is taught and enhances students’ learning.
 Technologies in science run the range from tools for performing experiments or collecting data (thermometers, temperature probes,
 microscopes, centrifuges) to digital technologies for completing analysis or displaying data (calculators, computers). All of them are
 essential tools for teaching, learning, and doing science. Computers and other digital tools allow students to collect, record, organize,
 analyze, and communicate data as they engage in science learning. They can support student investigations in every area of science.
 When technology tools are available, students can focus on decision making, reflection, reasoning, and problem solving.
 Connections to engineering, technology, and applications of science are included at all grade levels and in all domains. These
 connections highlight the interdependence of science, engineering, and technology that drives the research, innovation, and
 development cycle where discoveries in science lead to new technologies developed using the engineering design process. Additionally,
 these connections call attention to the effects of scientific and technological advances on society and the environment.
 Social Studies
 Natural connections between the core ideas for using science and social studies exist throughout the Standards. Students need a
 foundation in social studies to understand how ethical, social, economic, and political issues of the past and present impact the
 development and communication of scientific theories, engineering and technological developments, and other applications of science
 and engineering. Students can use historical, geographic, and economic perspectives to understand that all cultures have ways of
 understanding phenomena in the natural world and have contributed and continue to contribute to the fields of science and
 engineering. Sustainability issues and citizen science provide contemporary contexts for integrating social studies with science. Citizen
 science is the public involvement in inquiry and discovery of new scientific knowledge. This engagement helps students build science
 knowledge and skills while improving social behavior, increasing student engagement, and strengthening community partnerships.
 Citizen science projects enlist K-12 students to collect or analyze data for real-world research studies, which helps students develop a
 deep knowledge of geography, economics, and civic issues of specific regions.
Arizona Department of Education                                  Page| 43                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                             Arizona Science Standards
   Appendix 6: Connections to English Language Arts and Math
                                                               Kindergarten - 2nd Grade
                 Kindergarten                               1st Grade                                             2nd Grade
Arizona          Use age-appropriate scientific texts and biographies to develop instruction that integrates the Reading Standards for
English          Informational Text, the Reading Standards for Foundational Skills, and the Writing Standards
Language Arts
Arizona          Standards for Mathematical                 Standards for Mathematical Practice                   Standards for Mathematical
Mathematics      Practices                                    -Make sense of problems and persevere in solving    Practice
Standards          -Make sense of problems and persevere      them                                                  -Make sense of problems and persevere
                   in solving them                            -Use appropriate tools strategically                  in solving them
                                                              -Construct viable arguments and critique the          -Use appropriate tools strategically
                   -Use appropriate tools strategically       reasoning of others
                   -Look for and make use of structure                                                              -Construct viable arguments and critique
                                                              -Attend to precision                                  the reasoning of others.
                   -Look for and express regularity in        -Look for and make use of structure                   -Attend to precision
                   repeated reasoning                         -Look for and express regularity in repeated          -Look for and make use of structure
                 Counting and Cardinality                     reasoning                                             -Look for and express regularity in
                  -Develop competence with counting and     Measurement and Data                                    repeated reasoning
                  cardinality                                 -Measure lengths indirectly and by iterating length Operations and Algebraic
                  -Develop understanding of addition and      units                                               Thinking
                  subtraction within 10                       -Represent and interpret data
                                                                                                                    -Represent and solve problems involving
                 Measurement and Data                       Geometry                                                addition and subtraction
                  -Describe and compare measurable           -Reason with shapes and their attribute              Number and Operations in Base
                  attributes                                                                                      Ten
                  -Classify objects and count the number of                                                         -Use place value understanding and
                  objects in each category                                                                          properties of operations to add and
                                                                                                                    subtract
                                                                                                                  Measurement and Data
                                                                                                                    -Represent and interpret data
                                                                                                                    -Measure the length of an object using an
                                                                                                                    appropriate tool including metrics.
   Arizona Department of Education                                  Page| 44                     Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                                Arizona Science Standards
                                                                    3rd Grade - 5th Grade
                 3rd Grade                                     4th Grade                                             5th Grade
Arizona            Use age-appropriate scientific texts and biographies to develop instruction that integrates the Reading Standards for Informational
English                                           Text, the Reading Standards for Foundational Skills, and the Writing Standards
Language Arts
Arizona          Standards for Mathematical                    Standards for Mathematical Practice                   Standards for Mathematical Practice
Mathematics      Practices                                       -Make sense of problems and persevere in solving      -Make sense of problems and persevere in solving
Standards          -Make sense of problems and persevere         them                                                  them
                   in solving them                               -Use appropriate tools strategically                  reason abstractly and quantitatively
                                                                 -Construct viable arguments and critique the          -Construct viable arguments and critique the
                   -Reason abstractly and quantitatively         reasoning of others                                   reasoning of other
                   -Use appropriate tools strategically          -Attend to precision                                  -Model with mathematics
                   -Construct viable arguments and critique      -Look for and make use of structure                   -Use appropriate tools strategically
                   the reasoning of others                       -Look for and express regularity in repeated          -Attend to precision
                   -Use appropriate tools strategically          reasoning                                             -Look for and make use of structure
                   -Attend to precision                        Operations and Algebraic Thinking                       -Look for and express regularity in repeated
                   -Look for and make use of structure           -Use place value understanding and properties of      reasoning
                 Operations and Algebraic Thinking               operations to perform multi-digit arithmetic        Operations and Algebraic Thinking
                  -Represent and solve problems involving      Number and Operations in Base Ten                       -Write and interpret numerical expressions.
                  addition and subtraction                                                                             -Analyze patterns and relationships
                                                               Number and Operations - Fractions
                 Number and Operations in Base Ten               -Understand decimal notation for fractions and      Measurement and Data
                  -Use place value understanding and             compare decimal fractions                             -Convert like measurement units within a given
                  properties of operations to perform multi-   Measurement and Data                                    measurement system
                  digit arithmetic                                                                                     -Represent and interpret data
                                                                -Solve problems involving measurement and
                 Number and Operations - Fractions              conversion of measurements from a larger unit to
                                                                                                                       -Solve problems involving measurement and
                  -Understand fractions as numbers              a smaller unit                                         conversion of measurements from a larger unit to
                 Measurement and Data                                                                                  a smaller unit
                                                                -Represent and interpret data
                  -Measure and estimate liquid volumes and                                                             -Solve problems involving measurement
                  masses of objects                                                                                    -Geometric measurement; understand concepts of
                  -Solve problems involving measurement                                                                volume and relate volume to multiplication and
                  -Represent and interpret data                                                                        division.
   Arizona Department of Education                                    Page| 45                      Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                             Arizona Science Standards
                                                                 6th Grade - 8th Grade
                 6th Grade                                  7th Grade                                          8th Grade
Arizona            Use age-appropriate scientific texts and biographies to develop instruction surrounding the Reading Standards for Informational
English          Use age-appropriate scientific texts and biographies to develop instruction that integrates the Reading Standards for Informational
Language Arts                                                         Text, and the Writing Standards
Arizona          Standards for Mathematical                 Standards for Mathematical Practice                Standards for Mathematical Practice
Mathematics      Practices                                    -Make sense of problems and persevere in           -Make sense of problems and persevere in
Standards          -Make sense of problems and persevere      solving them                                       solving them
                   in solving them                            -Reason abstractly and quantitatively              -Reason abstractly and quantitatively
                   -Reason abstractly and quantitatively      -Use appropriate tools strategically               -Use appropriate tools strategically
                   -Use appropriate tools strategically       -Construct viable arguments and critique the       -Construct viable arguments and critique the
                   -Construct viable arguments and critique   reasoning of others                                reasoning of others.
                   the reasoning of others                    -Attend to precision                               -Attend to precision
                   -Use appropriate tools strategically       -Look for and make use of structure                -Look for and make use of structure
                   -Attend to precision                       -Look for and express regularity in repeated       -Look for and express regularity in repeated
                   -Look for and make use of structure        reasoning                                          reasoning
                   -Model with mathematics                    -Model with mathematics                            -Model with mathematics
                   -Look for and express regularity in      Statistics and Probability                         Expressions and Equations
                   repeated reasoning                         -Use random sampling to draw inferences about      -Understand the connections between
                 Ratios and Proportional                      a population                                       proportional relationships, lines, and linear
                 Relationships                                -Draw informal comparative inferences about        equations
                  -Understand ratio concepts and use ratio    two populations                                  Functions
                  reasoning to solve problems                 -Investigate chance processes and develop, use,    -Use functions to model relationships between
                 Expressions and Equations                    and evaluate probability models                    quantities
                  -Represent and analyze quantitative                                                          Statistics and Probability
                  relationships between dependent and                                                            -Investigate patterns of association in bivariate
                  independent variable                                                                           data
                 Geometry                                                                                        -Investigate chance processes and develop, use,
                  -Solve mathematical problems and                                                               and evaluate probability models
                  problems in real-world context involving
                  area, surface area and volume
   Arizona Department of Education                                 Page| 46                   Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19


                                                             Arizona Science Standards
                                                                 References
1Barkman,    R.C. (2000, November). Patterns, the Brain, and Learning. Retrieved February 16, 2018, from
http/www.ascd.org/publications/classroom-leadership/nov2000/Patterns,-the-Brain,-and-Learning.aspx.
2Harlen,   W. (2015) Working with Big Ideas of Science Education. Global Network of Science Academies (IAP) Science Education
Programme: Trieste, Italy.
3 Lee, O., & Buxton, C. A. (2010). Diversity and equity in science education: Theory, research, and practice. New York: Teachers College Press.
4 National  Research Council (NRC). (2012). A Framework for K-12 Science Education: Practices, crosscutting concepts, and core ideas.
Washington, DC: The National Academies Press.
5National Science Teachers Association. (2015, October). National Science Teachers Association. Retrieved June 13, 2018, from
NSTA Position Statement: Safety and School Science Instruction: http://www.nsta.org/about/positions/safety.aspx
6NGSS   Lead States. (2013) Next Generation Science Standards: For States, By States. Appendix D Case Studies. Washington, DC: The
National Academies Press.
7Quinn   H., Lee O., Valdés G. (2012). Language demands and opportunities in relation to next generation science standards for English
language learners: What teachers need to know. Paper presented at the Understanding Language Conference, Stanford, CA. Retrieved
November 15, 2017 from http://ell.stanford.edu/sites/default/files/pdf/academic-papers/03-
Quinn%20Lee%20Valdes%20Language%20and%20Opportunities%20in%20Science%20FINAL.pdf
8 Rodriguez,   A. J., & Berryman, C. (2002). Using sociotransformative constructivism to teach for understanding in diverse classrooms: A
beginning teacher’s journey. American Educational Research Journal, 39, 1017-1045.
9 Spang,  M. & Bang, C. A. (2014) Practice Brief #11: Implementing Meaningful STEM Education with Indigenous Students & Families.
Retrieved November 15, 2017 from http://stemteachingtools.org/brief/11.
Arizona Department of Education                                    Page| 47                Arizona 2018 Science Standards Modified 10/19/19
